Arkansas statutes. Title 24 Retirement And Pensions
Chapter 7 Retirement of Employees of Schools and Educational Institutions
Acts 2019, No. 427, § 23: July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that certain provisions of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System Act, an act that created a state agency for the purpose of providing retirement benefits to school employees of the state, are in need of revision and updating to maintain the teacher retirement laws in conformance with sound public pension policy; that the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System operates on a fiscal year of July 1 to June 30; that a July 1, 2019 effective date is necessary to allow the provisions of this act to begin on the first day of the fiscal year and to provide for the proper administration of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System; that the updates and revisions to the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System Act are of great importance for actuarial purposes and the protection of member benefits under the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System; and that this act is necessary in order to maintain an orderly system of benefits for the members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

Acts 2019, No. 594, § 2: July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that certain provisions of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System Act, a state agency created by the General Assembly for the purpose of providing retirement benefits to school employees of the state, are in need of revision and updating to maintain the teacher retirement laws in conformance with sound public pension policy; that the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System operates on a fiscal year of July 1 to June 30; that having a July 1, 2019, effective date is necessary to allow the provisions within this act to begin on the first day of the fiscal year to provide proper administration of the procedures herein; that such revisions and updating are of great importance for actuarial purposes and to protect the benefits to members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System; that the funding of employer contributions by the State of Arkansas is an integral component to the design and function of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System; and that this act is immediately necessary in order to maintain an orderly system of benefits for the members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.